Tennessee, session 114, HB0626.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 38, Chapter 8, Part 1, is amended by
adding the following new section:
(a) If a law enforcement officer becomes aware that an order of protection has
been entered, pursuant to title 36, chapter 3, part 6, against a person in the officer's
presence but the person has not been served with the order of protection, then the
officer must take appropriate steps to facilitate service of the order of protection,
including notifying the sheriff's department of the person's immediate location and any
other information that may assist in service of the order of protection.
(b) The curriculum requirements of the Tennessee peace officer standards and
training commission established by this part must include instruction on the requirements
of this section.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0626
000441
- 1 -